District of Columbia statutes.
38-903

Repair work by janitors.

The janitors of the principal school buildings, in addition to their other duties, shall do all minor repairs to buildings and furniture, glazing, fixing seats and desks, and take care of the heating apparatus, and shall be selected with reference to their qualifications to perform this work.

Feb. 25, 1885, 23 Stat. 318, ch. 145
Control of construction and repair of school buildings, see § 38-402.
1981 Ed., § 31-2203.
1973 Ed., § 31-1105.